Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.140

"Adulterated" as applicable to pesticides.

The term "adulterated" shall apply to any pesticide if its strength or purity deviates from the professed standard or quality as expressed on its labeling or under which it is sold, or if any substance has been substituted wholly or in part for the pesticide, or if any valuable constituent of the pesticide has been wholly or in part abstracted, or if any contaminant is present in an amount which is determined by the director to be a hazard.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 190 s 14.]